Hawaii statutes.
§634-12 Sale of property seized on
execution, when. [Repeal and reenactment on June 30, 2020. L 2015, c
101, §4.] When goods or chattels have been seized in execution by the
sheriff, deputy sheriff, a police officer, or an independent civil process server
from the department of public safety's list under section 353C-10 under process
of any court, and some third person claims to be entitled under a bill of sale,
chattel mortgage, or otherwise, to the goods and chattels by way of security
for a debt, the court or a judge may order a sale of the whole or part thereof,
upon such terms as to the payment of the whole or part of the secured debt or
otherwise as it or the judge shall think fit; and may direct the application of
the proceeds of sale in such manner and upon such terms as to the court or
judge may seem just. [L 1876, c 33, §7; RL 1925, §2874; RL 1935, §4063; RL
1945, §10045; RL 1955, §230-15; am L 1963, c 85, §3; HRS §634-45; ren HRS
§634-12; gen ch 1985; am L 1989, c 211, §10; am L 1990, c 281, §11; am L 2012,
c 142, §7; am L 2013, c 116, §§9, 25(8)]

Case Notes

Did not apply to district courts under prior law. 6 H. 254
(1879).

Claimant of goods seized by sheriff on execution not
authorized to apply for order of interpleader. 13 H. 88 (1900).

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next